Arkansas, session 2025, HB1783.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-37-114(a), concerning reduction of a
city of the first class to a city of the second class, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) Whenever the last federal census most recent federal decennial
census shows that any city of the first class has less than five thousand
(5,000) seven thousand five hundred (7,500) inhabitants, the city may be
reduced to a city of the second class upon the adoption of a resolution an
ordinance by the council of the municipal corporation requesting that the
grade of the municipal corporation be reduced.







*SSS219*
03/13/2025 2:02:44 PM SSS219